Washington statutes.
RCW 10.32.900

Effective date—2024 c 207.

This act takes effect July 1, 2025, except for section 17 of this act, which is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect May 1, 2024.

[ 2024 c 207 s 18.]